Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202012-518
Lots; plat; care,
improvement, adornment; annual exhibit; powers and duties of association.

A cemetery association shall
cause a plat of the cemetery grounds, and
of the lots laid
out in the cemetery,
to be made and recorded, such lots to be numbered by regular consecutive numbers.
It shall have power to enclose, improve, and
adorn the grounds and avenues and
erect buildings for the use of the association, to
prescribe rules for the enclosing and adorning of lots and for erecting monuments in the cemetery, and to prohibit any use, division, improvement, or adornment of a lot which
it may deem improper. An annual exhibit shall be made of the affairs of the
association.

R.S.1866, c. 25, § 51, p. 207;

R.S.1913, § 685;

C.S.1922, § 594;

C.S.1929, § 13-507;

R.S.1943, § 12-518;

Laws 2014, LB863, § 10.

This section makes definite the purposes for which expenditure of funds may be made. Root v. Morning View Cemetery Assn., 174 Neb. 438, 118 N.W.2d 633 (1962).